Maine, session 132, LD880.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-B MRSA §245 is enacted to read:
§245. Nondiscrimination in financial services
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Financial institution" means:
(1) A state or national bank or trust company;
(2) A state or federal savings and loan association;
(3) A state or federal credit union;
(4) A savings bank;
(5) An insurance company registered in this State and described in Title 24-A,
section 4; or
(6) An institution that:
(a) Holds and receives deposits, savings or share accounts;
(b) Issues certificates of deposit or provides to its customers a deposit account
subject to withdrawal by check, instrument, order or electronic means to effect
3rd-party payments;
(c) Provides insurance services; or
(d) Provides investment services.
B. "Financial service" means a service provided by a financial institution.
2. Fair access to financial services. To provide fair access to financial services, a
financial institution:
A. Shall make each financial service it offers available to each person in the geographic
market served by the financial institution on a nondiscriminatory basis;
B. Shall approve or deny a person a financial service that the financial institution offers
solely based on the quantitative, impartial, risk-based financial standards established
in advance by the financial institution;
C. May not deny a person a financial service that the financial institution offers when
the effect of the denial is to prevent, limit or otherwise disadvantage the person:
(1) From or regarding entering or competing in a market or business segment; or
(2) In such a way that benefits another person or business activity in which the
financial institution has a financial interest; and
D. May not, in coordination with others, deny a person a financial service that the
financial institution offers.
3. Nonfinancial criteria. A financial institution that uses standards or guidelines based
on nonfinancial, nontraditional or subjective criteria, such as environmental, social and
governance scores or diversity, equity and inclusion policies, shall:
Page 1 - 132LR2198(01)

A. Disclose to the bureau the specific standards, guidelines and criteria used by the
financial institution to determine access to or denial of a financial service for a person
in this State;
B. Provide to a person denied a financial service a disclosure with the specific
information, standards, guidelines and criteria used to support the denial, in bold 14-
point font;
C. Provide to a person denied a financial service a precise and thorough explanation of
how the financial institution became aware of the information that led the financial
institution to deny service, including the identity of any 3rd party that notified the
financial institution of the information and the nature of the notification by the 3rd
party, to the extent such disclosures are not prohibited by law; and
D. Comply with rules adopted by the bureau.
4. Violations. A violation of this section is governed by this subsection.
A. A financial institution that violates this section is subject to a fine of $10,000.
B. A financial institution that commits 5 or more violations of this section within a 12-
month period commits a Class D crime.
5. Enforcement. The superintendent shall enforce this section.
6. Rules. The superintendent shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.